Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2205
Council, defined.

Council shall mean the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 870;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 762;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 27.
July 18, 2026
Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care Advisory Committee on Aging, created, see section 68-1101.